Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1001.
do enact as follows:AB1001,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1001,29Section 2. 20.435 (1) (ck) of the statutes is created to read:AB1001,2,131020.435 (1) (ck) Community emergency medical services grants. As a 11continuing appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for grants to emergency 12medical services programs to employ a community paramedic or community 13emergency medical services practitioner.AB1001,314Section 3. 20.435 (1) (ck) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15.... (this act), is repealed.AB1001,416Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB1001,2,1717(1) Reconciliation provision.AB1001,2,2118(a) If 2025 Assembly Bill 970, or any other 2025 bill whose content is identical 19to the content of 2025 Assembly Bill 970, is enacted into law, then this act takes 20effect on the effective date of the first of those bills that is enacted into law or on the 21effective date of this paragraph, whichever is later.AB1001,2,2222(b) If par. (a) does not apply, then this act is void.AB1001,523Section 5. Fiscal changes.AB1001,3,424(1) Falls prevention initiatives grants. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) 1for the appropriation to the department of health services under s. 20.435 (1) (a), 2the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $200,000 and the dollar 3amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $200,000 for grants for falls 4prevention initiatives.AB1001,65Section 6. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 6publication, except as follows:AB1001,3,87(1) Community emergency medical services grants; repeal. The repeal 8of s. 20.435 (1) (ck) takes effect on July 1, 2027.AB1001,3,99